New York, session 2025-2026, S2022.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 8 of section 131-a of the 2 social services law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (xiv) to 3 read as follows: 4 (xiv) all of the income of a head of household or any person in the 5 household, who is receiving such aid or for whom an application for such 6 aid has been made, which is derived from funding from childcare stabili- 7 zation grants, childcare desert funding, or other non-recurring funding, 8 issued by the office of children and family services to childcare 9 providers. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 11 have been in full force and effect on and after January 1, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02632-01-5